South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1062.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Commission on Higher Education, relating to Determination of Rates of Tuition and Fees, designated as Regulation Document Number 5443, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. R.62-600 through 62-612 of Chapter 62 is being amended and replaced in its entirety. Revisions to the existing regulation for the SC Residency Regulation are being considered to clarify the policies and procedures for administering the program. In the proposed amendments, the regulation is being updated to reflect recently passed Act 51 of 2023, relating to the requirement to acquire a South Carolina Driver's license within a 45 day period of relocating to the state. In addition, the number of items required to show intent are being reduced. There are other revisions which seek to simplify the residency process for both applicants and institutions. The revisions seek to promote flexibility among the State institutions and their residency classification processes. The proposed regulation will require legislative review. A Notice of Drafting was published in the South Carolina State Register on June 27, 2025. ----XX----